Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB153.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 13A IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The General Assembly finds that the following administrative regulations and
any proposed amendments to the following administrative regulations are
deficient:
(a) 201 KAR 9:270, Professional standards for prescribing, dispensing, or
administering Buprenorphine-Mono-Product or Buprenorphine-Combined-
with-Naloxone; and
(b) 201 KAR 20:065, Professional standards for prescribing Buprenorphine-
MonoProduct or Buprenorphine-Combined-with-Naloxone by APRNs for
medication assisted treatment for opioid use disorder.
(2) Contrary provisions of any section of the Kentucky Revised Statutes
notwithstanding, the administrative regulations and any proposed amendments to
the administrative regulations referenced in subsection (1) of this section shall be
null, void, and unenforceable as of the effective date of this Act.
(3) Contrary provisions of any section of the Kentucky Revised Statutes
notwithstanding, the administrative bodies shall be prohibited from promulgating
administrative regulations that are identical to, or substantially the same as, the
administrative regulations and any proposed amendments to the administrative
regulations referenced in subsection (1) of this section.
(4) The administrative regulations and any proposed amendments to the
administrative regulations referenced in subsection (1) of this section shall be
available to the public, in the office of the Legislative Research Commission's
regulations compiler.
Page 1 of 4
XXXX 1/7/2026 10:18 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1411
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 311 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Notwithstanding any state law or administrative regulation to the contrary, the
State Board of Medical Licensure shall not promulgate any administrative
regulation that restricts or limits the prescribing, dispensing, or administering of
buprenorphine-mono-product, buprenorphine-combined-with-naloxone, or any
other Schedule III, IV, or V medication approved by the United States Food and
Drug Administration for the treatment of a substance use disorder.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section shall not prohibit the board from promulgating or
enforcing administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A that
apply to the prescribing, dispensing, or administering of all controlled substances
in one (1) or more schedules of controlled substances, including but not limited to
201 KAR 9:260.
SECTION 3. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 313 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Notwithstanding any state law or administrative regulation to the contrary, the
Kentucky Board of Dentistry shall not promulgate any administrative regulation
that restricts or limits the prescribing, dispensing, or administering of
buprenorphine-mono-product, buprenorphine-combined-with-naloxone, or any
other Schedule III, IV, or V medication approved by the United States Food and
Drug Administration for the treatment of a substance use disorder.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section shall not prohibit the board from promulgating or
enforcing administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A that
apply to the prescribing, dispensing, or administering of all controlled substances
in one (1) or more schedules of controlled substances, including but not limited to
201 KAR 8:540.
SECTION 4. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 314 IS CREATED TO
Page 2 of 4
XXXX 1/7/2026 10:18 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1411
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Notwithstanding any state law or administrative regulation to the contrary, the
Kentucky Board of Nursing shall not promulgate any administrative regulation
that restricts or limits the prescribing, dispensing, or administering of
buprenorphine-mono-product, buprenorphine-combined-with-naloxone, or any
other Schedule III, IV, or V medication approved by the United States Food and
Drug Administration for the treatment of a substance use disorder.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section shall not prohibit the board from promulgating or
enforcing administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A that
apply to the prescribing, dispensing, or administering of all controlled substances
in one (1) or more schedules of controlled substances, including but not limited to
201 KAR 20:057.
SECTION 5. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 315 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Notwithstanding any state law or administrative regulation to the contrary, the
Kentucky Board of Pharmacy shall not promulgate any administrative regulation
that restricts or limits the prescribing, dispensing, or administering of
buprenorphine-mono-product, buprenorphine-combined-with-naloxone, or any
other Schedule III, IV, or V medication approved by the United States Food and
Drug Administration for the treatment of a substance use disorder.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section shall not prohibit the board from promulgating or
enforcing administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A that
apply to the prescribing, dispensing, or administering of all controlled substances
in one (1) or more schedules of controlled substances.
Section 6. Whereas it is essential that the General Assembly promptly provide
effective access to drugs and medicines in the Commonwealth in order to provide for the
health and safety of citizens, an emergency is declared to exist, and this Act takes effect
Page 3 of 4
XXXX 1/7/2026 10:18 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1411
upon its passage and approval by the Governor or upon its otherwise becoming a law.
Page 4 of 4
XXXX 1/7/2026 10:18 AM Jacketed